District of Columbia statutes.
6-1401

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“ANSI” means the American National Standards Institute, Inc., American National Standard Specifications for Making Buildings and Facilities Accessible to and Useable by Physically Handicapped People (1980).

(2)

“BOCA” means the Building Officials and Code Administrators International, Inc.

(3)

“Building Code” means the BOCA Basic/National Building Code/1984, 9th Edition, the 1985 Supplement to the BOCA Basic/National Building Code, and the District of Columbia Building Code Supplement of 1986 as amended by the provisions of this act [D.C. Law 6-216].

(3A)

“Building Code Official” means the Director of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs.

(4)

“Construction Codes” means the consolidation of Model Codes, the Building Rehabilitation Code, the D.C. Supplement, and the provisions of this act, and any future amendments, supplements, or editions authorized by § 6-1409.

(5)

“Council” means the Council of the District of Columbia.

(6)

“D.C. Supplement” means:

(A)

The District of Columbia Building Code Supplement of 1986 submitted by the Mayor on June 30, 1986, as amended by section 11 of this act [D.C. Law 6-216];

(B)

The District of Columbia Plumbing Code Supplement of 1986 submitted by the Mayor on June 30, 1986, as amended by section 11 of this act [D.C. Law 6-216];

(C)

The District of Columbia Mechanical Code Supplement of 1986 submitted by the Mayor on June 30, 1986, as amended by section 11 of this act;

(D)

The District of Columbia Fire Prevention Code Supplement of 1986 submitted by the Mayor on June 30, 1986, as amended by section 11 of this act [D.C. Law 6-216];

(E)

The District of Columbia Existing Structures Code Supplement of 1986 submitted by the Mayor on June 30, 1986, as amended by section 11 of this act [D.C. Law 6-216];

(F)

The District of Columbia One and Two Family Dwelling Code Supplement of 1986 submitted by the Mayor on June 30, 1986, as amended by section 11 of this act [D.C. Law 6-216]; and

(G)

The District of Columbia Electrical Code Supplement of 1986 submitted by the Mayor on June 30, 1986, as amended by section 11 of this act [D.C. Law 6-216].

(7)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(8)

“Electrical Code” means the National Fire Protection Association National Electrical Code 1984, and the District of Columbia Electrical Code Supplement of 1986 as amended by the provisions of this act [D.C. Law 6-216].

(9)

“Existing Structures Code” means the BOCA Basic/National Existing Structures Code/1984, 1st Edition, and the District of Columbia Existing Structures Code Supplement of 1986 as amended by the provisions of this act [D.C. Law 6-216].

(10)

“Fire Prevention Code” means the BOCA Basic/National Fire Prevention Code/1984, 6th Edition, the 1985 Supplement to the BOCA Basic/National Fire Prevention Code, and the District of Columbia Fire Prevention Code Supplement of 1986 as amended by the provisions of this act [D.C. Law 6-216].

(10A)

“Fire protection systems” means devices, equipment, and systems utilized to detect a fire, activate an alarm, suppress or control a fire, or any combination thereof.

(11)

“Mechanical Code” means the BOCA Basic/National Mechanical Code/1984, 5th Edition, the 1985 Supplement to the BOCA Basic/National Mechanical Code, and the District of Columbia Mechanical Code Supplement of 1986 as amended by the provisions of this act.

(12)

“Model Codes” means:

(A)

The BOCA Basic/National Building Code/1984, 9th Edition;

(B)

The BOCA Basic/National Plumbing Code/1984, 6th Edition;

(C)

The BOCA Basic/National Mechanical Code/1984, 5th Edition;

(D)

The BOCA Basic/National Fire Prevention Code/1984, 6th Edition;

(E)

The BOCA Basic/National Existing Structures Code/1984, 1st Edition;

(F)

The CABO One and Two Family Dwelling Code, 1983 Edition;

(G)

The National Fire Protection Association National Electrical Code 1984; and

(H)

The 1985 Supplement to the BOCA Basic/National Building Code, Basic/National Fire Prevention Code, Basic/National Mechanical Code, and Basic/National Plumbing Code.

(13)

“One and Two Family Dwelling Code” means the CABO One and Two Family Dwelling Code, 1983 Edition, and the District of Columbia One and Two Family Dwelling Code Supplement of 1986 as amended by the provisions of this act [D.C. Law 6-216].

(14)

“Plumbing Code” means the BOCA Basic/National Plumbing Code/1984, 6th Edition, the 1985 Supplement to the BOCA Basic/National Plumbing Code, and The District of Columbia Plumbing Code of 1986 as amended by the provisions of this act [D.C. Law 6-216].

Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 2, 34 DCR 1072
June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-162, §§ 201(a)(1), (2), 49 DCR 4438
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 302(a), 49 DCR 6968
This section is referenced in § 7-1710, § 7-2004, § 25-504, and § 47-2861.
1981 Ed., § 5-1301.
D.C. Law 14-162 added par. (3A); and in par. (4), substituted “Model Codes, the Building Rehabilitation Code,” for “Model Codes,”.
D.C. Law 14-190 added pars. (3A) and (10A).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 302(a) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary (90 days) addition of provisions concerning new construction minimum standards of visitability for persons with disabilities, see §§ 2-12 of the Visitability Requirements Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-636, January 25, 2013, 60 DCR 2048).
Short title of title III of Law 14-190: Section 301 of D.C. Law 14-190 provided that title III of the act may be cited as the Construction Codes Amendment Act of 2002.
“This act,” referred to in paragraphs (3), (4), (6)(A) through (6)(G), (8) through (11), (13), and (14), is D.C. Law 6-216.
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to DC Law 6-100, the “Litter Control Administration Act of 1985;” DC Law 6-42, the “Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs Civil Infractions Act of 1985;” DC Law 5-165, the “DC Air Pollution Control Act of 1984;” DC Law 13-172, the “Rodent Control Act of 2000;” and DC Law 6-126, the “Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-5, February 1, 2002 ( 49 DCR 911).
Establishment of Building Code Advisory Committee: See Mayor’s Order 89-257, November 7, 1989.
Section 301 of D.C. Law 14-162 provided: “Pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), the Mayor may issue rules to implement the provisions of this act.”